test/src/morphology/A-ciekkes_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Adjective - cieˊǩǩes e-stem pöly: # Noun - full paradigm
     cieˊǩǩes+A+Sg+Nom: cieˊǩǩes
     cieˊǩǩes+A+Sg+Gen: ceäkˈkaz
     cieˊǩǩes+A+Sg+Acc: ceäkˈkaz
     cieˊǩǩes+A+Sg+Ill: ceäkˈksa
     cieˊǩǩes+A+Sg+Loc: ceäkˈksest
     cieˊǩǩes+A+Sg+Com: čeäkˈksin
     cieˊǩǩes+A+Ess: čeäkˈksen
     cieˊǩǩes+A+Par: čeäkˈksed
     cieˊǩǩes+A+Sg+Abe: ceäkˈkaztää
     cieˊǩǩes+A+Pl+Nom: ceäkˈkaz
     cieˊǩǩes+A+Pl+Gen: čeäkˈksi
     cieˊǩǩes+A+Pl+Acc: čeäkˈksid
     cieˊǩǩes+A+Pl+Ill: čeäkˈksid
     cieˊǩǩes+A+Pl+Loc: čeäkˈksin
     cieˊǩǩes+A+Pl+Com: čeäkˈksivuiˊm
     cieˊǩǩes+A+Pl+Abe: čeäkˈksitää
